Illinois, session 104th, HB4703.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Short 5Line Railroad Modernization Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Credit" means the Short Line Railroad Infrastructure 8Modernization Credit awarded under this Act.9    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity.11    "Qualified applicant" means:12        (1) a railroad company located in whole or in part in 13    Illinois that is classified by the United States Surface 14    Transportation Board as a Class II or Class III railroad 15    and that makes qualified railroad expenditures; or16        (2) an owner or lessee of a rail siding, industrial 17    spur, or industry track that is located on or adjacent to 18    any railroad in Illinois if the applicant makes qualified 19    new rail infrastructure expenditures.20    "Qualified new rail infrastructure" means:21        (1) new track infrastructure such as industrial leads, 22    switches, spurs, sidings, rail loading docks, and 23    transloading structures;  HB4703- 2 -LRB104 18237 HLH 31676 b1        (2) infrastructure necessary for engineering and site 2    preparation involved with servicing rail-served customer 3    locations;4        (3) infrastructure associated with the expansion of a 5    Class II or Class III railroad; and 6        (4) new track infrastructure constructed to serve 7    rail-served customer locations in Illinois.8    "Qualified railroad expenditures" means gross expenditures 9for maintenance, reconstruction, or replacement of existing 10railroad infrastructure that is owned or leased by a Class II 11or Class III railroad and is located partly or wholly in 12Illinois, including track, roadbed, bridges, crossings, 13signals, industrial leads and sidings, and track related 14structures. "Qualified railroad expenditures" does not include 15expenditures that are used to generate a federal tax credit or 16that are funded by a State or federal grant.17    "Rail-served customer location" means a location in the 18State at which qualified new rail infrastructure will be 19constructed to connect a customer's facility to a rail line 20either by building a new facility with rail access or by 21connecting an existing facility to the rail network.22    "Taxpayer" means a qualified applicant that is (i) subject 23to subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois 24Income Tax Act or (ii) a tax-exempt entity that is owned by a 25port or a governmental entity.   HB4703- 3 -LRB104 18237 HLH 31676 b1    Section 10. Purpose. The Illinois General Assembly finds 2that a modern, efficient, and safe rail system is vital to 3Illinois' economic competitiveness, supply chain resilience, 4and environmental goals. Through targeted investment in short 5line railroads, industrial sidings, and new freight rail 6infrastructure, this Act is intended to spur private sector 7development, strengthen rural and urban connectivity, and 8ensure that Illinois remains a national leader in 9transportation and logistics. This Act will support 10manufacturing, agriculture, renewable energy, and emerging 11industries by lowering shipping costs, improving access to 12global markets, and expanding multimodal opportunities. By 13adopting forward-looking infrastructure tools, Illinois will 14create good-paying jobs, attract long-term investment, reduce 15highway congestion, and decrease greenhouse gas emissions. 16Illinois must aggressively modernize its rail system so that 17businesses and communities can compete and thrive against 18domestic and foreign competitors. 19    Section 15. Allowable credits; limitations.20    (a) For taxable years that begin after January 1, 2027 and 21begin before January 1, 2037, a taxpayer is entitled to a 22credit against the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) 23of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act equal to:24        (1) the taxpayer's:25            (A) qualified railroad expenditures; and  HB4703- 4 -LRB104 18237 HLH 31676 b1            (B) qualified new rail infrastructure 2        expenditures; multiplied by3        (2) 50%.4    (b) The amount of a tax credit allowed under subsection 5(a) shall not exceed the following:6        (1) For qualified railroad expenditures, the product 7    of:8            (A) the number of miles of Class II or Class III 9        railroad track owned or leased by the taxpayer in 10        Illinois at the close of the taxable year; multiplied 11        by12            (B) $5,000.13        (2) For qualified new rail infrastructure 14    expenditures, the lesser of:15            (A) 50% of the qualified new rail infrastructure 16        expenditures for each rail-served customer location 17        completed by the taxpayer in the taxable year; or18            (B) $2,000,000 per rail-served customer location.19    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an expenditure 20shall be classified as either a qualified railroad expenditure 21or a qualified new rail infrastructure expenditure, but not 22both.23    (c) The aggregate amount of tax credits permitted in a 24taxable year under this Section for all taxpayers shall not 25exceed:26        (1) for qualified railroad expenditures allowed under   HB4703- 5 -LRB104 18237 HLH 31676 b1    this Act, $9,000,000; and2        (2) for qualified new rail infrastructure expenditures 3    allowed under this Act, $10,000,000.4    (d) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 5the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 6the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 7may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 85 taxable years following the excess credit year. The credit 9shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is tax 10liability. If there are credits from more than one tax year 11that are available to offset tax liability, the earlier credit 12shall be applied first. 13    Section 20. Application; qualified railroad expenditures.14    (a) A taxpayer wishing to claim a tax credit under this 15Section must apply to the Department after completion of the 16project for which qualified railroad expenditures were 17incurred. The Department shall prescribe the form and manner 18of the application, which must include:19        (1) the number of miles of railroad track owned or 20    leased by the taxpayer in Illinois; and21        (2) a description and certification of the amount of 22    the taxpayer's qualified railroad expenditures.23    (b) The Department shall evaluate a taxpayer's eligibility 24for a tax credit under this Act.25    (c) The Department shall certify the eligibility of a   HB4703- 6 -LRB104 18237 HLH 31676 b1taxpayer that meets the requirements for a tax credit under 2this Act.3    (d) Upon satisfactory review of the application, the 4Department shall issue a tax credit certificate to the 5taxpayer stating the amount of the tax credit earned in the 6taxable year to which the taxpayer is entitled. 7    Section 25. Application; qualified new rail infrastructure 8expenditures.9    (a) A taxpayer wishing to claim a tax credit under this 10Section must apply to the Department for precertification 11prior to commencing construction, in the form and manner 12prescribed by the Department. Upon review, and if the 13Department determines that the application conforms to the 14requirements of this Act and the rules adopted under this Act, 15the Department shall issue a precertification letter 16authorizing the taxpayer to proceed with the project.17    (b) The Department shall establish quarterly application 18windows for precertification requests. Applications received 19during a quarterly application window shall be reviewed 20together, and credits shall be awarded to taxpayers meeting 21statutory qualifications, subject to the caps specified in 22Section 15.23    (c) If eligible applications in a quarterly period would 24cause total awards for the fiscal year to exceed the cap in 25subsection (c) of Section 15, the Department shall apply the   HB4703- 7 -LRB104 18237 HLH 31676 b1prioritization criteria in subsection (d) of this Section. 2Credits shall be awarded until the annual cap is fully used.3    (d) The Department shall give priority to projects that:4        (1) provide critical rail access to industrial parks, 5    ports, or economic development projects locating adjacent 6    to rail; 7        (2) serve businesses in value-added agriculture, 8    advanced manufacturing, supply chain/distribution 9    solutions, or environmentally friendly or sustainable 10    manufacturers, including those reducing carbon emissions 11    or utilizing renewable energy; and12        (3) demonstrate the facilitation of significant 13    private capital investment, job creation, or strategic 14    economic benefits to the State.15    (e) If aggregate funding authority under subsection (c) of 16Section 15 is not fully used in any quarterly period, the 17unused authority shall automatically carry forward to the next 18application period within the same fiscal year. Any funding 19authority not awarded by the close of the fiscal year shall 20expire.21    (f) A precertification is valid for 12 months after 22project award. A project that has been pre-certified must 23commence construction within 12 months of the date of the 24precertification award.25    (g) Upon project completion, the taxpayer must notify the 26Department and provide necessary documentation as required by   HB4703- 8 -LRB104 18237 HLH 31676 b1the Department to calculate the tax credit and certify project 2completion. The Department shall certify the eligibility of a 3taxpayer that meets the requirements for a tax credit under 4this Act.5    (h) Upon satisfactory review of the final application and 6supporting documentation, the Department shall issue a tax 7credit certificate to the taxpayer stating the amount of tax 8credit earned in the taxable year in which the taxpayer is 9entitled. 10    Section 30. Transferability. A taxpayer may transfer the 11tax credit awarded under this Act by written agreement. A 12transfer of credits earned under this Act shall be made, in 13accordance with rules adopted by the Department, by the 14taxpayer earning the credits at any time after certification 15and before expiration of the credit. The Department shall 16issue a certificate of transfer to each transferor and 17transferee, identifying the amount of the credit transferred. 18The transfer certificate shall be attached to the transferor's 19and transferee's income tax return under the Illinois Income 20Tax Act. 21    Section 35. Pass-through entities. For partners and 22shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of 23Section 251 of the Illinois Income Tax Act shall apply with 24respect to the credit under this Act.   HB4703- 9 -LRB104 18237 HLH 31676 b1    Section 40. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 2for the implementation of this Act. 3    Section 45. Sunset. The Department shall not enter into 4any new agreements under the provisions of this Act after 5December 31, 2036. 6    Section 900. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 7adding Section 246 as follows: 8    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)9    Sec. 246. Short Line Railroad Modernization Act. For 10taxable years that begin after January 1, 2027 and begin 11before January 1, 2037, a taxpayer that qualifies for a credit 12against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 13Section 201 under the Short Line Railroad Modernization Act is 14entitled to a credit as provided in that Act. 15    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.